morphology/task_3/src/task_3/arabic.lexc
! Declare multicharacter strings
Multichar_Symbols +I +II +Act +Pass +Perf +Imperf +3 +M +F

! Decalre `Root`
LEXICON Root

Verb ;

! Declare `Verb` lexicon
LEXICON Verb

ktb Vinf ;
zhr Vinf ;
sfr Vinf ;
mrd Vinf ;
hsn Vinf ;

! Declare `Vinf` lexicon
LEXICON Vinf

+I:^1  Vtype ;
+II:^2 Vtype ;

! Declare `Vtype` lexicon
LEXICON Vtype

+Act:^3  Vaspect ;
+Pass:^4 Vaspect ;

! Declare `Vaspect` lexicon
LEXICON Vaspect

+Perf:^5   Vperson ;
+Imperf:^6 Vperson ;

! Declare `Vperson` lexicon
LEXICON Vperson

+3:0 Vgender ;

! Declare `Vgender` lexicon
LEXICON Vgender

+M:^7 #;
+F:^8 #;
